District of Columbia statutes.
29-704.04

General partner’s liability.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, all general partners shall be liable jointly and severally for all debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the limited partnership unless otherwise agreed by the claimant or provided by law.

(b)

A person that becomes a general partner of an existing limited partnership is not be personally liable for a debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited partnership incurred before the person became a general partner.

(c)

A debt, obligation, or other liability of a limited partnership incurred while the limited partnership is a limited partnership, whether arising in contract tort, or otherwise, and that is incurred while the limited partnership is a limited liability partnership, is solely an obligation of the limited partnership. A general partner shall not be personally liable, directly or indirectly, by way of contribution or otherwise, for such debt, obligation, or other liability solely by reason of being or acting as a general partner. This subsection shall apply despite anything inconsistent in the partnership agreement that existed immediately before the consent required to become a limited liability limited partnership under § 29-704.06(b)(2).

(d)

The failure of a limited liability limited partnership to observe formalities relating to the exercise of its powers or management of its activities and affairs is not a ground for imposing liability on a general partner of the limited liability limited partnership for a debt, obligation, or liability of the partnership.

(e)

An amendment of a certificate of limited partnership which deletes a statement that the limited partnership is a limited liability limited partnership does not affect the limitation in this section on the liability of a general partner for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the limited partnership incurred before the amendment became effective.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(4)(D), 59 DCR 13171

History

This section is referenced in § 29-701.02, § 29-704.05, § 29-706.07, § 29-708.06, § 29-708.07, § 29-708.08, and § 29-710.07.

Section References

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Effect of Amendments

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 404 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.

Editor's Notes